Missouri, session 2026, SB1014.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 167.621, 170.047, 170.048, and
170.307, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 167.621, 170.047, 170.048,
and 170.307, to read as follows:
167.621. 1. Persons providing health services under
sections 167.600 to 167.621 and subdivision (3) of
subsection 3 of section 170.307 shall obtain authorization
from a parent or guardian of the child before providing
services as provided by section 431.061.
2. No employee of any school district may be required
to administer medication or medical services for which the
employee is not qualified according to standard medical
practices. No unqualified employee who refuses to
administer medication or medical services shall be subject
to any disciplinary action for such refusal. Nothing herein
shall be construed to prevent any employee from providing
routine first aid, provided that any employee shall be held
harmless and immune from any liability if such employee is
following a proper procedure adopted by the local school
board.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1014 2
3. Any qualified employee shall be held harmless and
immune from any civil liability for administering medication
or medical services in good faith and according to standard
medical practices.
170.047. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Jason Flatt/Avery Reine Cantor Act".
2. (1) Beginning in the 2017-18 school year and
continuing until the end of the 2022-23 school year, any
licensed educator may annually complete up to two hours of
training or professional development in youth suicide
awareness and prevention as part of the professional
development hours required for state board of education
certification.
(2) Beginning in the 2023-24 school year and
continuing in subsequent school years, the practicing
teacher assistance programs established under section
168.400 may offer and include at least two hours of in-
service training provided by each local school district for
all practicing teachers in such district regarding suicide
prevention. Each school year, all teachers, principals, and
licensed educators in each district may attend such training
or complete training on suicide prevention through self-
review of suicide prevention materials. Attendance at the
training shall count as two contact hours of professional
development under section 168.021 and shall count as two
hours of any other such training required under this section.
(3) Beginning in the 2027-28 school year and
continuing in subsequent school years, each local school
district shall provide at least two hours of in-service
training regarding suicide prevention for all licensed
educators.

SB 1014 3
3. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop guidelines suitable for training or
professional development in youth suicide awareness and
prevention. The department may develop materials that may
be used for the training described under subsection 2 of
this section or may offer districts materials developed by a
third party that districts may use for the training.
4. For the 2028-29 school year and all subsequent
school years, suicide prevention training described in
subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection 2 of this section and
guidelines and materials developed or used under subsection
3 of this section shall require training on risk and
protective factors, warning signs, response procedures, and
postvention support.
5. For purposes of this section, the [term] following
terms mean:
(1) "Licensed educator", [shall refer to] any teacher
with a certificate of license to teach issued by the state
board of education or any other educator or administrator
required to maintain a professional license issued by the
state board of education;
(2) "Postvention", an organized response in the
aftermath of a suicide to facilitate the healing of
individuals from the grief and distress of suicide loss, to
mitigate other negative effects of exposure to suicide, or
to prevent suicide among people who are at high risk after
exposure to suicide.
[5.] 6. The department of elementary and secondary
education may promulgate rules and regulations to implement
this section.
[6.] 7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the

SB 1014 4
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2016, shall be invalid and void.
170.048. 1. By July 1, 2018, each district shall
adopt a policy for youth suicide awareness and prevention,
including plans for how the district will provide for the
training and education of its district employees.
2. Each district's policy shall address and include,
but not be limited to, the following:
(1) Strategies that can help identify students who are
at possible risk of suicide;
(2) Strategies and protocols for helping students at
possible risk of suicide; and
(3) Protocols for responding to a suicide death.
3. By July 1, 2017, the department of elementary and
secondary education shall develop a model policy that
districts may adopt. When developing the model policy, the
department shall cooperate, consult with, and seek input
from organizations that have expertise in youth suicide
awareness and prevention. By July 1, 2021, and at least
every three years thereafter, the department shall request
information and seek feedback from districts on their
experience with the policy for youth suicide awareness and
prevention. The department shall review this information
and may use it to adapt the department's model policy. The

SB 1014 5
department shall post any information on its website that it
has received from districts that it deems relevant. The
department shall not post any confidential information or
any information that personally identifies any student or
school employee.
4. (1) Beginning July 1, [2025] 2027, a public school
or charter school that serves any pupils in grades seven to
twelve and that issues pupil identification cards shall have
printed on either side of the cards[:
(a)] the three-digit dialing code that directs calls
and routes text messages to the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline,
988[; and
(b) The nonemergency telephone number of the local
police department; and
(c) May have printed on either side of the cards:
a. The six-digit dialing code that routes text
messages to the Crisis Text Line, 741741; and
b. The telephone number of a local suicide prevention
hotline, if such hotline is available].
(2) If, on July 1, [2025] 2027, a public school or
charter school subject to the requirements of this
subsection has a supply of unissued pupil identification
cards that do not comply with the requirements of
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the school shall issue
those cards until that supply is depleted.
(3) Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall apply to
a pupil identification card issued for the first time to a
pupil and to a card issued to replace a damaged or lost card.
5. For the 2028-29 school year and all subsequent
school years, each school district shall update the school
district's policy for youth suicide awareness and prevention
training required under subsection 1 of this section to

SB 1014 6
address and include training on risk and protective factors,
warning signs, response procedures, and postvention support.
6. For the 2028-29 school year and all subsequent
school years, the model policy developed under subsection 3
of this section shall be updated to include a requirement
for training on risk and protective factors, warning signs,
response procedures, and postvention support.
7. For purposes of this section, "postvention" shall
mean an organized response in the aftermath of a suicide to
facilitate the healing of individuals from the grief and
distress of suicide loss, to mitigate other negative effects
of exposure to suicide, or to prevent suicide among people
who are at high risk after exposure to suicide.
170.307. 1. For school year 2022-23 and each school
year thereafter, upon graduation from high school, pupils in
public schools and charter schools shall have received
mental health awareness training given any time during a
pupil's four years of high school.
2. Beginning in school year 2022-23, any public school
or charter school serving grades nine through twelve shall
provide enrolled students instruction in mental health
awareness. Students with disabilities may participate to
the extent appropriate as determined by the provisions of
the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act or Section
504 of the Rehabilitation Act. Instruction shall be
included in the district's existing health or physical
education curriculum. Instruction shall be based on a
program established by the department of elementary and
secondary education.
3. (1) For the 2027-28 school year and each
subsequent school year, before entering grade nine, each
pupil in a public school shall have received mental health

SB 1014 7
awareness training given any time while such pupil is in
grade five to grade eight.
(2) For the 2027-28 school year and each subsequent
school year, any public school serving grades five to eight
shall provide enrolled students with age-appropriate
instruction in mental health awareness. Students with
disabilities may participate to the extent appropriate as
determined by the provisions of the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400,
et seq., as amended, or Section 504 of the federal
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794, as
amended. Instruction shall be included in the district's
existing health or physical education curriculum.
Instruction shall be based on a program established by the
department of elementary and secondary education.
4. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall promulgate rules to develop a model
curriculum to be used by school districts to provide the
instruction required by this section. Any rule or portion
of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2022, shall be invalid and void.
✓